Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 7. Investment of State Funds

Cross references. —

For duty of attorney general to examine and approve public securities before any of the permanent funds of the state shall be invested therein, see §

9-1-605

.

As to authority of state and other political entities to invest in certain securities, see §

9-4-831

.

For constitutional provision requiring state to keep school funds for exclusive benefit of public schools and requiring legislature to provide for the investment of such funds, see art. 7, § 6, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Officers and Employees §§ 263 to 265.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 223 to 229.

§ 9-4-701.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to investment of state funds in insured or guaranteed higher education loans, see §

21-16-113

.

As to investment of state funds in bonds and other securities issued by University of Wyoming, see §

21-17-447

.

As to investment in community college bonds, see §

21-18-313

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 48, § 3, repealed Laws 1999, ch. 71, § 3, which had provided: “By December 31 of each calendar year, the state treasurer and the Wyoming Business Council shall each provide a report to the joint minerals, business and economic development committee on the effectiveness of the investment program authorized by W.S. 9-4-701(g). The reports shall include the costs incurred by the state to the permanent mineral trust fund, and the revenue received by the Wyoming Business Council through fees and businesses who utilized the program.”

Higher Education Act. —

Section 438 of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, referred to in subsection (f)(ii), appears as 20 U.S.C. § 1087-1.

Security Act. —

The federal Security Act of 1933 appears as 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.

Investment Company Act of 1940. —

The federal Investment Company Act of 1940 appears as 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-702.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

§ 9-4-703.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to state loan and investment board generally, see ch. 34 of title 11.

§ 9-4-704.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 38, Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 9-4-705.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

§ 9-4-706.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

§ 9-4-707.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

§ 9-4-708.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

Investment Advisor's Act of 1940. —

The Investment Advisor's Act of 1940 is codified as 15 U.S.C.S. § 80b-1 et seq.

§ 9-4-709.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

§ 9-4-710.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

§ 9-4-711.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1996, ch. 112, § 4, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to require the state or any other government entity to divest itself of securities or other investments which it lawfully held on June 30, 1996, solely because of the enactment of this legislation.”

§ 9-4-712.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 4.

§ 9-4-713.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as W.S.

9-4-719

by Laws 2008, ch. 113, §
3.

§ 9-4-714.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Alternative investments” means investments in nontraditional asset classes or in traditional asset classes which are utilized in a nontraditional strategy;

“Asset classes” means categories of securities with similar characteristics and properties, such as cash equivalents, stocks, bonds and real estate;

“Board” means the state loan and investment board;

“Fund” means as defined by W.S. 9-4-203(a)(vii);

“Permanent funds” means the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii), the Wyoming permanent land fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iv), the excellence in higher education endowment fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vi), the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vii), the Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship endowment fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(viii) and the Wyoming’s tomorrow scholarship endowment fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(ix);

“Committee” means the investment funds committee created by W.S.

9-4-720

;

“Designated chief investment officer” means the employee retained pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(a);

“This act” means W.S.

9-4-714

through

9-4-721

.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 1; 2017 ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 81, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020; 2022 ch. 52, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(vi) substituted “9-4-721” for “9-4-719.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added "and the Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship endowment fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(viii)" at the end and made a related change.

The 2020 amendment,

added (a)(vi) and (a)(vii); and redesignated former (a)(vi) as (a)(viii).

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(v), added “and the Wyoming's tomorrow scholarship endowment fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(ix)” at the end and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 9-4-715.
Permissible investments.

The state treasurer, in consultation with the investment funds committee, shall employ a designated chief investment officer who shall have minimum qualifications including at least ten (10) years of experience managing institutional investment portfolios of in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00), experience with hiring and managing internal and external investment managers and extensive experience in any two (2) or more of the following areas: domestic equity, fixed income securities, international equity or alternative investments. The designated chief investment officer shall provide the state treasurer with information and recommendations regarding the investment of state funds and additional information as requested by the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall compile an annual report which shall include investment, income, individual and aggregate gains and losses by fund and the extent to which the state investment policy is being implemented. Subject to requirements of subsection (c) of this section, state funds may be invested in any investment:

Authorized by the legislature; or

Authorized or approved by the board.

The state treasurer, or his designee, which shall be registered under the Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 as amended if required to be registered by the terms of that act as amended, may invest the permanent funds in equities, including stocks of corporations in accordance with subsections (a) through (e) of this section and W.S.

9-4-716

. The state treasurer shall report at least annually to the select committee on capital financing and investments, the joint appropriations committee and the investment funds committee on the analysis conducted pursuant to paragraph (d)(ii) of this section and W.S.

9-4-716

(b)(ix) and (e).

The state treasurer shall obtain the approval of the board prior to the investment of funds in alternative investments, provided:

The investment funds committee shall review any new proposed investment of funds in alternative investments and shall submit recommendations to the board;

The approval of the board shall be complete after consideration of any recommendation from the investment funds committee and upon the review and written acceptance by the board of the material terms of the instruments governing the investment;

Any material adverse change to the terms of instruments governing investments, previously approved by the board, at any time while the investments are held by the state of Wyoming shall require the renewal of approval of such investments by the board.

When approving, acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling and managing investments of the state of Wyoming, the members of the board, the members of the investment funds committee,the state treasurer, designees of the state treasurer or any other fiduciary appointed by the state treasurer, the board or the investment funds committee shall:

Exercise the judgment and care of a prudent investor as specified by the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, W.S.

4-10-901

through

4-10-913

;

Evaluate the risk of investments using a strategy based on the principles of the capital market theory which are generally accepted and followed by institutional investors including long-term investors. This strategy includes a consideration of the following:

Risks shall be mitigated through diversification of asset classes and investment approaches and through diversification of individual securities;

Prudent risk taking is a necessary element of long-term investing and is needed to achieve the long-term objectives of a fund.

Individual investments or groups of investments made under this act shall not be evaluated solely in isolation but also in the context of the entire investment portfolio and as part of an overall investment strategy of the trust or fund from which the investment is derived, consistent with the policies for such trust or fund established under W.S.

9-4-716

by the board. The purchase of a security or the making of any direct investment by the state treasurer or his designee in a security shall not constitute a delegation of his duties under this article or under any rule promulgated under this article.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 207.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 110, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 110, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 35, § 2.

Except as provided in subsection (o) of this section, upon request of the board, the state treasurer may invest funds received from sales of state trust lands plus up to two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) one-time seed money contained in the common school account within the permanent land fund, by purchasing land and improvements thereon within Wyoming as assets of the trust.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 41, § 1.

The state treasurer shall not invest state funds for a specific public purpose authorized or directed by the legislature in excess of a total of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), excluding investments made pursuant to W.S.

37-5-406

or

37-5-605

. By November 1 of each calendar year, the state treasurer, in consultation with the board, the Wyoming water development office, the Wyoming business council and the office of state lands and investments, shall provide a report to the select committee on capital financing and investments and the investment funds committee on all state funds invested for a specific public purpose authorized or directed by the legislature. The report shall include:

A list of all investment or loan requests made in the previous year, the amount loaned or invested and the status of all investments and loans, including those which are delinquent as to the payment of any installment of principal or interest due;

Recommendations for future legislation, including recommendations for adjustments to the amount allocated by this subsection and recommendations for adjustments to the amounts allocated under applicable state law for individual investments authorized or directed by the legislature for a specific public purpose; and

The cost of the investment to the people of Wyoming in terms of:

Forgone earnings that could have been obtained if the funds had been invested by the state treasurer with the permanent funds of the state;

Administrative and other costs associated with each investment.

Upon request of the board and when determined by the board to be consistent with the duties and obligations owed to beneficiaries of state trust land sales proceeds, the state treasurer shall invest funds received from the sale of state trust lands to the federal government by purchasing federal lands and improvements within Wyoming from the federal government.

There is created the pool A investment account. The state treasurer, or his designee, which shall be registered under the Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 as amended if required to be registered by the terms of that act as amended, pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of this section and after consultation with the state agency or agencies receiving or administering investment earnings from the monies invested in the pool A investment account, may invest monies comprising the pool A investment account in equities including stocks of corporations in accordance with subsections (a) and (c) through (e) of this section and W.S.

9-4-716

. The state loan and investment board, in consultation with the state agency or agencies receiving or administering investment earnings from the monies invested in the pool A investment account, shall annually review the state investment policy statements for the investment pool created by this subsection as required under W.S.

9-4-716

. Monies in the following funds shall be invested in the pool A investment account:

The Wyoming tobacco settlement trust fund created by W.S. 9-4-1203(a);

The Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account created by W.S. 9-15-103(a);

The Wyoming cultural trust fund established by W.S. 9-2-2304(a);

The Wyoming public television matching fund account created by W.S. 21-23-202(a);

The trust account within the Wyoming game and fish fund created by W.S.

23-1-501

(f) and any other monies designated by the Wyoming game and fish commission for investment in the Pool A investment account from within the Wyoming game and fish fund created by W.S.

23-1-501

;

Through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2034, the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account created by W.S.

9-4-220

.1(a);

The transportation trust fund created by W.S. 9-4-607(a);

Not more than fifty percent (50%) of all funds received under the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act that are deposited into the unclaimed property account created by W.S.

34-24-124

, excluding investment earnings from the account;

The emergency water projects account created by W.S. 41-2-124(f), including the voluntary pool program subaccount within that account;

The state fair endowment account created by W.S.

11-10-118

;

The Wyoming children’s trust fund created by W.S.

14-8-106

;

The Wyoming national guard youth challenge program endowment account created by W.S.

19-7-207

;

The Wyoming military assistance trust fund created by W.S.

19-7-401

;

The Wyoming education trust fund created by W.S.

21-22-101

;

The emergency medical services sustainability trust account created by W.S.

33-36-115

.

The state treasurer, or his designee, which shall be registered under the Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 as amended if required to be registered by the terms of that act as amended shall invest the legislative stabilization reserve account created in W.S.

9-4-219

in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible subject to the following:

Investments shall be made in accordance with investment policy statements adopted by the board under W.S.

9-4-716

. In adopting investment policy statements for the legislative stabilization reserve account, the board shall seek to preserve the balance of the account as necessary to address:

A budget shortfall or structural budget deficit through contingent appropriations and expenditures under W.S. 9-2-1014(d)(ii) and (iii);

A published consensus revenue estimating group estimate of revenues that is less than existing legislative appropriations for state government operations or support of public schools;

Other emergencies and needs identified or authorized by the legislature under Wyoming statutes and session laws.

To the extent funds are available and prior to making any other investments, five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00) shall be invested in short term fixed income investment grade securities;

After consultation with the state budget department,the unobligated, unencumbered balance of the legislative stabilization reserve account in excess of the amount specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, as calculated by the state auditor on October 1 of each fiscal year, may be invested in equities, including stocks of corporations. Investments under this paragraph shall be made in compliance with subsections (a) and (c) through (e) of this section and W.S.

9-4-716

;

Not later than November 1 of each year, the state treasurer shall report to the joint appropriations committee and the select committee on capital financing and investments regarding the annual review of the investment policy statement for the legislative stabilization reserve account and the investment performance of the account.

The state treasurer, or his designee, which shall be registered under the Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 as amended if required to be registered by the terms of that act as amended, may invest the unobligated, unencumbered balance of the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account created under W.S. 9-4-719(b) and common school permanent fund reserve account created under W.S. 9-4-719(f) in equities, including stocks of corporations. Investments under this subsection shall be in accordance with subsections (a) and (c) through (e) of this section and W.S.

9-4-716

. In adopting investment policy statements for the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account and common school permanent fund reserve account, the board shall seek to preserve the balance of each account in a manner that strives for the highest possible risk-adjusted total net return consistent with an appropriate level of safety and liquidity.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 1; 2009, ch. 96, § 1, ch 168, § 204; 2011, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 129, § 207; 2012, ch. 42, § 1; 2013 ch. 95, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; 2015 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 110, §§
2, 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 41, § 1, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2017 ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2017 ch. 69, § 1, effective March 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 91, § 1, effective March 2, 2017; 2018 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 34, § 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 38, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2020 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 55, § 1, effective March 11, 2020; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020; 2020 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 96, § 1, substituted “June 30, 2011” for “June 30, 2009” in (m)(vi).

Laws 2009, ch. 96, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 2, 2009.

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch 168, § 204, effective July 1, 2009, in (m)(ii)(B), deleted the last sentence, which read: “The council shall review each project considered with the Wyoming energy commission created pursuant to W.S.

30-7-101

, provided the project being considered involves an area over which the commission has been given authority.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (m), substituted “six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000.00)” for “one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00)”; in (m)(vi), substituted “2017” for “2011,” and added the second sentence; added (m)(vii); and in (n), substituted “one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00)” for “five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00).”

The second 2011 amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 207, effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (f), which read: “The state treasurer may invest and keep invested not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00) of any state permanent funds through the purchase of nondelinquent federally guaranteed or insured higher education loans from any nonprofit Wyoming corporation organized to acquire such loans or its agent. The state shall not administer loans purchased and shall contract for loan servicing. Special allowances provided by section 438 of the Higher Education Act of 1965 remain effective.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “Except as provided in subsection (o) of this section” in (k), and added (o).

The 2013 amendment,

in (m) substituted “three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000.00)” for “six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000.00)” and added the second sentence; in (n) substituted “six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000.00)” for “one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00).”

Laws 2013, ch. 95, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “as amended if required to be registered by the terms of that act as amended” for “or any bank as defined in that act.”

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by
ch. 26 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (n), deleted former second sentence and added present second and third sentence; and added (n)(i) through (n)(iii)(B).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 41 § 1, added “as recommended by the Wyoming business council” at the end of (m)(ii)(C); and added (m)(viii).

Laws 2016, ch. 41 § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

The third
2016 amendment, by ch. 110 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added the last sentence in (g).

The fourth 2016 amendment, by ch. 110 § 3, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (h), which read: “The state treasurer may pledge not to exceed one hundred million dollars ($ 100,000,000.00) from the Wyoming permanent mineral trust fund to guarantee local government bonds under
W.S.

9-4-1002

. These funds shall be invested as other funds in that fund, but the state treasurer shall ensure sufficient liquidity of investments to ensure required disbursements can be made.”

The 2016 amendment,

by ch. 110, § 2, effective July 1, 2020, repealed former (g), which read, “The state treasurer may pledge not to exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000.00) from the common school account in the permanent land fund to guarantee school district bonds under W.S. 9-4-1001(d). These funds shall be invested as other funds in that account, but the state treasurer shall ensure sufficient liquidity of investments to ensure required disbursements can be made. This subsection is repealed effective July 1, 2020.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 69, § 1, in (b), substituted “invest up to seventy percent (70%) of the permanent funds in equities, including stocks of corporations” for “invest monies of the permanent funds in securities but not more than fifty-five percent (55%) shall be invested in common stocks,” and added the last sentence; added (d)(ii) and the (d)(i) designation, and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 69, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 14 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (n), substituted “one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) for “six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000.00).”

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 91, § 1, in (b), substituted “as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, may invest monies up to seventy percent (70%)” for “may invest monies”; substituted “equities, including stocks of corporations” for “securities but not more than fifty-five percent (55%) shall be invested in common stocks”; and added (p).

Laws 2017, ch. 91, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

The fourth
2017 amendment, by ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (d) added “the members of the investment funds committee created by this act” following “members of the board,” added “or the investment funds committee” preceding “shall exercise judgment” and made one related change.

While no amendment gave effect to the others, all have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first
2018 amendment, by ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in the first sentence of (b),
deleted “upon written authority as provided in subsections
(c) and (d) of this section” following “terms of that
act as amended” and added “pursuant to subsections (c)
and (d) of this section” at the end; and in (p), substituted
“act as amended, pursuant to subsections” for “act
as amended, upon written authority as provided in subsections.”

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, added (p)(vi).

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added (p)(vii).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 34, § 3, effective July 1, 2020, in (n), inserted “or

37-5-605

” at the end of the first sentence.

The third 2019 amendment by ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (j), which read: “(j) The state treasurer may invest not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) from the permanent mineral trust fund in assignments from counties of their rights to reimbursement of deferred taxes and interest from taxpayers under W.S. 39 13 107(b)(iii)(F), including the right to any tax lien on those properties resulting from deferral of taxes and interest.”

The fourth 2019 amendment, by ch. 38, § 1, added (q).

Laws 2019, ch. 38, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (p)(viii).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 55, § 1, added (r).

Laws 2020, ch. 55, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2020.

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 82, § 2, in the introductory language of (a) deleted the first sentence, which read “The state treasurer is the chief investment officer of the state of Wyoming,” added the present first and second sentences, substituted “state treasurer shall compile an annual report which shall” for “state treasurer's annual report shall” in the present third sentence; in (b) added “and the investment funds committee” following “joint appropriations committee” and made related changes; added (c)(i); redesignated former (c)(i) as present (c)(ii) and added “after consideration of any recommendation from the investment funds committee and” preceding “upon the review”; redesignated former (c)(ii) as present (c)(iii); in the introductory language of (d) deleted “created by this act” following “investment funds committee”; and in the introductory language of (n), added “and the investment funds committee” following “financing and investments.”

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The fourth 2020 amendment, by ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (p)(ix).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendments.—

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, in the first sentence of (q)(iii), added “state” preceding “budget,” deleted “division of the” preceding “department” and “of administration and information” preceding “up to fifty-five percent.”

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (b), deleted “up to seventy percent (70%) of” following “may invest,” substituted “in accordance with” for “pursuant to,” “(c) and (d)” for “(a) through (e),” added “and W.S.

9-4-716

”; and added “and (e)” at the end of the second sentence.

The third 2021 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the third sentence of (p), deleted “up to seventy percent (70%) of the” following “may invest” and added “in accordance with subsections (a) and (c) through (e) of this section and W.S.

9-4-716

”; added (p)(x) through (p)(xv); added “net” following “highest” in (q); in (q)(iii), deleted “up to fifty-five percent (55%) of” preceding “the unobligated” in the first sentence, in the second sentence,” added “(a) and,” substituted “through (e)” for “and (d),” added “and W.S.

9-4-716

”; in the first sentence of (r), deleted “pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of this section,” preceding “may invest” and “up to seventy-five percent (75%) of” preceding “the unobligated,” substituted “subsections (a) and (c) through (e) of this section and” for “investment policy statements adopted by the board under” and added “net” following “risk-adjusted total”.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “and any other monies designated by the Wyoming game and fish commission for investment in the Pool A investment account from within the Wyoming game and fish fund created by W.S.

23-1-501

;” in (p)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2016, ch. 41 § 1,
amended (m)(ii)(C),
effective immediately, and also created new paragraph (m) (viii) which,
by its provision, repealed all of subsection (m) effective July 1, 2016.

Laws 2016, ch. 41 § 4, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts or bond issuances of the state of Wyoming executed prior to July 1, 2016.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 9-4-716.
State investment policy; investment consultant.

The board, in consultation with the investment funds committee, shall adopt investment policy statements for state funds and shall review those policy statements at least annually. These policy statements shall be subject to the following:

The board may specify groupings of state funds for which separate investment policy statements are appropriate. At a minimum, those groupings shall include state funds for which there is a trust obligation, short term funds for operations and all other funds. The board may determine criteria under which certain funds shall be separately managed;

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the state treasurer from pooling any state funds for investment purposes, including meeting cash flow requirements in accordance with approved investment policy statements.

The investment policy statements shall include the following:

Nominal return benchmarks;

Definition of risk and of return;

Risk tolerance;

Permissible investments and quality standards;

Liquidity requirements;

Cash flow projections for the grouping of funds;

Procedures for selecting and dismissing investment managers when utilized;

Indices or benchmarks against which the returns will be measured;

Two (2) risk mitigation metrics for managing and mitigating the risks of investments consistent with the strategy specified in W.S. 9-4-715(d)(ii):

One (1) metric shall specify the maximum percentage of monies in the state fund or state funds that may be invested in securities in consideration of all the factors developed for the fund’s investment policy statement under this subsection; and

One (1) metric shall measure risk in the state fund or state funds using a value at risk measurement technique or other similar risk measurement technique.

The state treasurer, in consultation with the investment funds committee,shall develop and submit proposed investment policy statements for each grouping of state funds specified in subsection (a) of this section and may contract for assistance in developing proposals or in making suggestions for modifications to existing investment policy statements. The state treasurer shall report quarterly to the board and the investment funds committee regarding the performance of investments with respect to each grouping of state funds specified by the board under subsection (a) of this section and such other information as may be required by the board.

The board:

Shall procure the services of a qualified entity to evaluate:

At least annually, the reasonableness and comprehensiveness of the investment policy statements required under this section;

At least quarterly, the performance of the investments for each grouping based upon recognized indices and the reasonableness of the mix of assets in light of anticipated cash flow requirements and the investment policy statements;

At least annually or when market conditions warrant a change or reallocation of investments, the risks of investing state funds using the metrics specified in the investment policy statements pursuant to paragraph (b)(ix) of this section and the risk profile under subsection (e) of this section.

Shall require competition to procure those services required under paragraph (i) of this subsection at least every four (4) years;

Shall receive an appropriation directed to the office of state lands and investments to be used to compensate the entity retained under paragraph (i) of this subsection for its services.

In investing monies of a fund or account which may be invested in stock of a corporation or other equities, the overall risk profile of the investments, excluding any specific public purpose investment authorized or directed by the legislature, shall not materially exceed the risk profile of a reference portfolio that consists of seventy percent (70%) global equities and thirty percent (30%) domestic fixed income investments. The state treasurer after consultation with the investment funds committee shall submit to the board the committee’s recommendations of specific benchmarks for the measurement of the portfolio risk characteristics. The specific benchmarks shall be determined by the board. Any provision of law which restricts the investment of a specific fund or account to a greater degree than the provisions of this subsection shall control over this subsection.

Investments made in accordance with this section and W.S.

9-4-715

and policies adopted pursuant to this section shall be deemed to satisfy provisions of law which require funds to be invested in a manner to obtain the highest net return consistent with preservation of principal or the corpus of a fund.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 1; 2014 ch. 71, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2017 ch. 69, § 1, effective March 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020; 2021 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2014 amendment,

in (d)(ii) substituted “four (4)” for “three (3)” preceding “years.”

Laws 2014, ch. 71, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 69, § 1, added (b)(ix) and (d)(i)(C), and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 69, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 14 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (c) added “in consultation with the investment funds committee created by this act” near the beginning.

The 2020 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a) added “in consultation with the investment funds committee” following “The board”; and in (c) substituted “investment funds committee, shall” for “investment funds committee created by this act, shall” and “quarterly to the board and the investment funds committee” for “quarterly to the board.”

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added "and the risk profile under subsection (e) of this section" in (d)(i)(C); and added (e) and (f).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added "and the risk profile under subsection (e) of this section" in (d)(i)(C); and added (e) and (f).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 113, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.